Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201880-335
Law; how construed.

On and after July 1, 2017, unless otherwise specified, whenever any provision of law refers to the Division of Veterans’ Homes of the Department of Health and Human Services in connection with duties and functions transferred to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, such law shall be construed as referring to the department.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 15.